Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB339.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 14.1(d)(1)(v) of the act of June 30, 1981 (P.L.128, No.43), known as the Agricultural Area Security Law, is amended and subsection (i) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 14.1. Purchase of agricultural conservation easements.* * *(d) Program approval.--(1) The standards, criteria and requirements established by the State board for State board approval of county programs for purchasing agricultural conservation easements shall include, but not be limited to, the extent to which the county programs consider and address the following:* * *12345678910111213141516171819 (v) (I) Provisions requiring a farmland tract to be contiguous acreage of at least [50] 25 acres in size unless the tract is at least ten acres in size and is either utilized for a crop unique to the area or is contiguous to property which has a perpetual conservation easement in place held by a "qualified organization" as defined in [section 170(h)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 170(h)(3))] 26 U.S.C. § 170(h)(3) (relating to charitable, etc., contributions and gifts).(II) A county may require a farmland tract to be contiguous acreage of at least 35 acres in size unless the tract [is at least ten acres in size and] is [either] utilized for a crop unique to the area, adjacent to the preserved land or is contiguous to a property which has a perpetual conservation easement in place held by a "qualified conservation organization" as defined in [section 170(h)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986] 26 U.S.C. § 170(h)(3). If a county implements the provisions of this subclause, State funds used for the purchase of an agricultural conservation easement less than 50 acres in size may include costs incidental to the purchase and shall not exceed 50% of the purchase price per acre, unless it is at least ten acres in size and is either utilized for a crop unique to the area or is contiguous to a property which has a perpetual conservation easement in place held by a "qualified conservation organization" as defined in [section 170(h)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986] 26 20250SB0339PN0276 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 U.S.C. § 170(h)(3). A county program shall require a minimum weighted value of 20% for prioritizing applications for agricultural conservation easement purchase when implementing the provisions of paragraph (ii.1).* * *(i) Subdivision of land after easement purchase.--* * *(3) (i) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (1) and subsection (d)(1)(v), a county program shall provide for land subject to an agricultural conservation easement to be subdivided under the following conditions:(A) The tract to be created by subdivision is less than ten acres.(B) The tract created under clause (A) is conveyed or transferred to the owner of a contiguous tract of land subject to an agricultural conservation easement under this act.(C) Deeds of merger are prepared and filed with the recorder of deeds as follows:(I) To add the tract created under clause (A) as a fee simple interest to the parcel of the new owner . (II) To add the tract created under clause (A) to the deed of easement of the new owner. (D) The tract remaining after subdivision under clause (A) meets the provisions of paragraph (1) and subsection (d)(1)(v).(ii) A subdivision under this paragraph shall not be subject to a roll-back tax under the "Pennsylvania 20250SB0339PN0276 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Farmland and Forest Land Assessment Act of 1974."* * *Section 2. Section 14.2 of the act is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 14.2. Agricultural Conservation Easement Purchase Fund.* * *(c) Realty transfer tax funding.--Ten percent of the tax collected by the Commonwealth under section 1102-C of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the "Tax Reform Code of 1971," shall be deposited into the fund for the p urchase of agricultural conservation easements under section 14.1. Section 3. This act shall take effect in 30 days.20250SB0339PN0276 - 4 - 123456789101112